Utah statutes.
76-1-103.   Application of code -- Offense prior to effective date.
(1) The provisions of this code shall govern the construction of, the
punishment for, and defenses against any offense defined in this code or,
except where otherwise specifically provided or the context otherwise
requires, any offense defined outside this code; provided such offense was
committed after the effective date of this code.
(2)  Any offense committed prior to the effective date of this code shall be
governed by the law, statutory and non-statutory, existing at the time of
commission thereof, except that a defense or limitation on punishment
available under this code shall be available to any defendant tried or retried
after the effective date. An offense under the laws of this state shall be
deemed to have been committed prior to the effective date of this act if any
of the elements of the offense occurred prior thereto.
